Colorado, session 2026A, HB1124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado's electric grid is vulnerable to severe space weather
events and to the late-time component of a high-altitude electromagnetic
-2- HB26-1124

pulse;
(b) Geomagnetically induced currents entering the grid through
grounded transformer neutrals can cause half-cycle saturation, excessive
reactive power consumption, harmonic distortion, and catastrophic failure
of extra-high-voltage transformers that require 3 to 6 years or longer to
replace;
(c) Not all transmission-owning entities in Colorado are subject
to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission;
(d) A coordinated, statewide approach that includes
investor-owned utilities, rural electric cooperatives and their wholesale
providers, municipal utilities, and federal power marketing
administrations is essential;
(e) In 2013, President Barack Obama recognized the electric grid
as one of the nation's most vital critical infrastructure sectors in
presidential policy directive 21 and executive order 13636, declaring that
its incapacity or destruction "would have a debilitating impact on security,
national economic security, national public health or safety, or any
combination of those matters", thereby establishing grid resiliency as an
urgent, bipartisan national priority; and
(f) Targeted, hardware-based hardening represents a prudent,
cost-effective insurance policy against potentially catastrophic blackouts.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 44 to title
40 as follows:
ARTICLE 44
Electric Grid Resiliency
40-44-101. Definitions.
(1) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION.
-3- HB26-1124

(2) "COVERED ENTITY" MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS OR OPERATES
A COVERED TRANSFORMER.
(3) "COVERED TRANSFORMER" MEANS A POWER TRANSFORMER OR
GENERATOR STEP-UP TRANSFORMER WITH A HIGH-SIDE OPERATING
VOLTAGE OF ONE HUNDRED KILOVOLTS OR MORE AND A NAMEPLATE
RATING OF TWENTY-FIVE MILLION VOLT-AMPERES OR MORE LOCATED IN
COLORADO OR SERVING COLORADO LOAD.
(4) (a) "HARDWARE-BASED MITIGATION" MEANS THE USE OF
ADVANCED SYSTEMS, DEVICES, AND MATERIALS IN HARDWARE TO
ENHANCE THE RESILIENCE AND RELIABILITY OF ELECTRIC GRID
COMPONENTS.
(b) "HARDWARE-BASED MITIGATION" INCLUDES THE
DEVELOPMENT OF TRANSFORMER RESILIENCE, SOLID-STATE POWER
SUBSTATIONS, AND MICROGRIDS.
(5) "TASK FORCE" MEANS THE COLORADO ELECTRIC GRID
RESILIENCY TASK FORCE CREATED IN SECTION 40-44-102.
(6) (a) "TRANSMISSION-OWNING ENTITY" MEANS A PERSON THAT
OWNS, OPERATES, OR CONTROLS COVERED TRANSFORMERS.
(b) "TRANSMISSION-OWNING ENTITY" INCLUDES INVESTOR-OWNED
UTILITIES, COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATIONS, MUNICIPALLY OWNED
UTILITIES, WHOLESALE GENERATION AND TRANSMISSION PROVIDERS, AND
FEDERAL POWER MARKETING ADMINISTRATIONS.
40-44-102. Colorado electric grid resiliency task force -
creation - membership.
(1) Creation and duration. THE COLORADO ELECTRIC GRID
RESILIENCY TASK FORCE IS CREATED TO STUDY THE ISSUE OF GRID
RESILIENCE AND TO MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR AND
-4- HB26-1124

THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) Membership. THE TASK FORCE CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING
EIGHTEEN MEMBERS:
(a) (I) (A) FOUR LEGISLATIVE MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES, WITH TWO MEMBERS FROM EACH CHAMBER AND TWO
MEMBERS FROM EACH MAJOR POLITICAL PARTY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
1-1-104 (22);
(B) THE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO RESILIENCY OFFICE
ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 24-32-121 WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL
AFFAIRS, OR THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(C) THE DIRECTOR OF THE DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1603 WITHIN
THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY, OR THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE; AND
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
REGULATORY AGENCIES, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE.
(II) THE MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS
(2)(a)(I)(A) TO (2)(a)(I)(D) OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTE A PANEL THAT
SHALL APPOINT BY MAJORITY VOTE:
(A) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF INVESTOR-OWNED UTILITIES;
(B) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF RURAL ELECTRIC COOPERATIVES OR
RURAL ELECTRIC WHOLESALE PROVIDERS;
(C) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF MUNICIPALLY OWNED ELECTRIC
UTILITIES, EITHER A SINGLE UTILITY OR JOINT ACTION AGENCIES CREATED
BY MULTIPLE MUNICIPALLY OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITIES;
(D) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A MULTISTATE GENERATION AND
TRANSMISSION ASSOCIATION;
-5- HB26-1124

(E) ONE MEMBER WITH TECHNICAL EXPERTISE IN ENGINEERING
RELATED TO GEOMAGNETICALLY INDUCED CURRENTS AND HIGH-ALTITUDE
ELECTROMAGNETIC PULSES;
(F) ONE MEMBER WITH TECHNICAL EXPERTISE IN TRANSMISSION
PLANNING; AND
(G) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF LARGE INDUSTRIAL POWER USERS.
(III) A UTILITY OR AN ASSOCIATION OF UTILITIES MAY NOMINATE
INDIVIDUALS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(a)(II)(A) TO (2)(a)(II)(G) OF
THIS SECTION TO THE PANEL DESCRIBED IN THE INTRODUCTORY PORTION
OF SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE WESTERN AREA POWER
ADMINISTRATION WITHIN THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY,
OR THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER'S DESIGNEE.
(3) Appointment authority - terms.
(a) (I) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(2)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL MAKE THEIR INITIAL APPOINTMENTS
TO THE TASK FORCE NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 12, 2026. THE MEMBERS
APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION SERVE A
TERM OF TWO YEARS. THE MEMBERS APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTION
(2)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION SERVE A TERM OF FOUR YEARS.
(II) THE PANEL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL MAKE ITS INITIAL APPOINTMENTS TO THE TASK FORCE NO
LATER THAN OCTOBER 30, 2026.
(b) EACH MEMBER OF THE TASK FORCE WHO IS APPOINTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE
APPOINTING OFFICIAL. IF A TASK FORCE MEMBER IS REMOVED BY THE
APPOINTING AUTHORITY OR RESIGNS, THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL
-6- HB26-1124

APPOINT ANOTHER MEMBER TO FILL THE VACANCY WITHIN FORTY-EIGHT
DAYS FOLLOWING THE REMOVAL.
(4) Remuneration.
(a) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 2-2-326, EACH LEGISLATIVE
MEMBER OF THE TASK FORCE SERVES WITHOUT COMPENSATION BUT IS
ENTITLED TO RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR ACTUAL AND NECESSARY
EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE MEMBER'S DUTIES ON
THE TASK FORCE.
(b) THE NONLEGISLATIVE MEMBERS OF THE TASK FORCE SERVE
WITHOUT COMPENSATION AND WITHOUT REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES;
EXCEPT THAT A TASK FORCE MEMBER WHO IS A STATE EMPLOYEE MAY BE
PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE EMPLOYEE'S NORMAL PAY.
(5) Meetings.
(a) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SHALL ORGANIZE AND CALL THE FIRST
MEETING OF THE TASK FORCE BY NOVEMBER 28, 2026.
(b) THE TASK FORCE SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS
MEMBERS.
(c) THE TASK FORCE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE EVERY MONTH
UNTIL IT COMPLETES ITS DUTIES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-44-103. THE
CHAIR MAY CALL SUCH ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS ARE NECESSARY FOR
THE TASK FORCE TO COMPLETE ITS DUTIES.
(6) Department of regulatory agencies support. UPON REQUEST
BY THE TASK FORCE, THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES SHALL
PROVIDE OFFICE SPACE, EQUIPMENT, AND STAFF SERVICES AS MAY BE
NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS ARTICLE 44.
40-44-103. Task force duties.
-7- HB26-1124

(1) Duties. THE TASK FORCE SHALL:
(a) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND JULY 1 OF EACH
EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR THEREAFTER, COMPLETE OR CAUSE TO BE
COMPLETED A RIGOROUS, UNIFORM ENGINEERING ASSESSMENT OF EVERY
COVERED TRANSFORMER IN COLORADO;
(b) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND JULY 1 OF EACH
EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR THEREAFTER, DEVELOP A PRIORITIZED STATEWIDE
HARDENING AND SPARE-TRANSFORMER PLAN WITH COST ESTIMATES,
COST-BENEFIT ANALYSES, AND RECOMMENDED FUNDING MECHANISMS;
(c) RECOMMEND RULES, LEGISLATION, AND INTERSTATE OR
FEDERAL COST-SHARING ARRANGEMENTS;
(d) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 15, 2028, AND NOVEMBER 15 OF
EACH EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR THEREAFTER, PUBLISH A REPORT DETAILING
ITS RECOMMENDATIONS CONCERNING CHANGING OR PROPOSING NEW
RULES, LEGISLATION, OR INTERSTATE OR FEDERAL COST-SHARING
ARRANGEMENTS; AND
(e) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), ON OR
BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2029, AND FEBRUARY 1 OF EACH ODD-NUMBERED
YEAR THEREAFTER, REPORT ITS FINDINGS DETAILED IN THE REPORT
PUBLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION TO
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT COMMITTEE
AND THE SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
(2) Minimum technical standards. IN COMPLETING THE DUTIES
DETAILED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, THE TASK FORCE MUST:
(a) USE THE LATE-TIME (E3) HIGH-ALTITUDE ELECTROMAGNETIC
PULSE WAVEFORM AND PARAMETERS SPECIFIED IN FIGURE A.5 OF
-8- HB26-1124

INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD
61000-2-9:2025, WITH A PEAK ELECTRIC FIELD OF EIGHTY-FIVE VOLTS PER
KILOMETER AND A PEAK MAGNETIC FIELD OF TWENTY THOUSAND
NANOTESLAS FOR TYPICAL LOW-CONDUCTIVITY GROUND;
(b) MODEL OPERATING CONDITIONS AT FULL RATED LOAD AT THE
TIME OF EXPOSURE;
(c) APPLY AGE AND CONDITION DE-RATING PURSUANT TO
INSTITUTE OF ELECTRICAL AND ELECTRONICS ENGINEERS STANDARD
C57.91-2011 AND C57.110-2018;
(d) INCORPORATE SITE-SPECIFIC OR BEST-AVAILABLE REGIONAL
GROUND CONDUCTIVITY MODELS; AND
(e) QUANTIFY, FOR EACH COVERED TRANSFORMER, SUSCEPTIBILITY
TO HALF-CYCLE SATURATION, GEOMAGNETICALLY-INDUCED-CURRENT
DRIVEN HARMONICS, REACTIVE POWER ABSORPTION, AND HOT-SPOT
HEATING OR INSULATION DEGRADATION.
40-44-104. Mandatory participation and cost recovery.
(1) A TRANSMISSION-OWNING ENTITY SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE
TASK FORCE ASSESSMENT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-44-103 AND PROVIDE
ANY REQUESTED DATA.
(2) REASONABLE AND PRUDENT COSTS INCURRED TO COMPLY WITH
THIS ARTICLE 44 OR RULES ADOPTED UNDER THIS ARTICLE 44 ARE
RECOVERABLE THROUGH RATES, MEMBER ASSESSMENTS, OR ORDINARY
BUDGETING PROCESSES.
40-44-105. Reporting.
(1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND DECEMBER 31 OF
EACH ODD-NUMBERED YEAR THEREAFTER, A COVERED ENTITY SHALL FILE
WITH THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION A REPORT,
-9- HB26-1124

MARKED AS "CRITICAL ENERGY/ELECTRIC INFRASTRUCTURE
INFORMATION", CONTAINING:
(a) TRANSFORMER SPECIFICATIONS AND INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
(I) TRANSFORMER MANUFACTURERS;
(II) COUNTRY AND DATE OF MANUFACTURE;
(III) DATE ENERGIZED;
(IV) GENERAL LOCATION AND FUNCTION;
(V) DETAILED DESIGN DATA, INCLUDING CORE TYPE, WINDING
CONFIGURATION, MEASURED OR CALCULATED DIRECT CURRENT
RESISTANCE, AND SINGLE-PHASE OR THREE-PHASE POWER; AND
(VI) MEGAVOLT-AMPERES RATING AND VOLTAGE RATIO;
(b) SUSCEPTIBILITY FINDINGS AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-44-103
(2)(e);
(c) ESTIMATED REPLACEMENT COST AND LEAD TIME;
(d) RECOMMENDED MITIGATION MEASURES AND COST ESTIMATES,
TO INCLUDE:
(I) EXPLICIT CATEGORIZATION OF OPTIONS BY COST TIER AND
EFFECTIVENESS, WITH A PREFERENCE FOR HARDWARE UPGRADES OVER
DEPLOYING SPARE HARDWARE;
(II) INTERSTATE COST-SHARING OPTIONS; AND
(III) COST-BENEFIT ANALYSES OF MITIGATION STRATEGIES;
(e) A PRIORITIZED LIST FOR HARDENING OR SPARE PROCUREMENT
FOCUSED ON AUTOMATIC, NONPROCEDURAL HARDWARE-BASED
MITIGATION, BUT REACTIVE OPERATIONAL PROCEDURES ALONE ARE NOT
SUFFICIENT PROTECTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (1)(e), WITH BLOCKING
OR SIGNIFICANTLY REDUCING GEOMAGNETICALLY INDUCED CURRENTS
FLOW AS THE PRIMARY FOCUS; AND
-10- HB26-1124

(f) RECOMMENDED FUNDING MECHANISMS, INCLUDING FEDERAL
GRANTS AND RATE RECOVERY.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), ON OR
BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2029, AND FEBRUARY 1 OF EACH ODD-NUMBERED
YEAR THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL PREPARE A SUMMARY OF THE
REPORTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND PRESENT IT
TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT
COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE,
OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
40-44-106. Sunset review - repeal.
SECTIONS 40-44-102 TO 40-44-105 ARE REPEALED, EFFECTIVE
SEPTEMBER 1, 2031. BEFORE THE REPEAL, SECTIONS 40-44-102 TO
40-44-104 ARE SCHEDULED FOR REVIEW IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
2-3-1203.
40-44-107. Rules.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT RULES
APPLICABLE TO ENTITIES UNDER ITS JURISDICTION REQUIRING
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE HIGHEST-PRIORITY HARDWARE-BASED
MITIGATION MEASURES IDENTIFIED BY THE TASK FORCE UNLESS
EQUIVALENT PROTECTION IS DEMONSTRATED.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, add
(22)(a)(IX) as follows:
2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(22) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2031:
(IX) THE COLORADO ELECTRIC GRID RESILIENCY TASK FORCE
-11- HB26-1124

CREATED IN SECTION 40-44-102.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-12- HB26-1124